Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.880

District or municipal court judges retirement allowance—In lieu of RCW 41.40.790.

In lieu of the retirement allowance provided under RCW 41.40.790, the retirement allowance payable for service as a district court judge or municipal court judge, for those judges who elected to participate under RCW 41.40.873(1), shall be equal to one and six-tenths percent of average final compensation for each year of service earned after the election. The total retirement benefit accrued or purchased under chapter 189, Laws of 2006 in combination with benefits accrued during periods served prior to the election shall not exceed thirty-seven and one-half percent of average final compensation.

[ 2006 c 189 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 189: See note following RCW 2.14.115.